Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 19. Interstate Compact on Educational Opportunity for Military Children
§ 806m.
Financing of the interstate commission — Article XIV.

The Interstate Commission shall pay or provide for the payment of the reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization, and ongoing activities.

The Interstate Commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment from each member state to cover the cost of the operations and activities of the Interstate Commission and its staff which must be in a total amount sufficient to cover the Interstate Commission’s annual budget as approved each year. The aggregate annual assessment amount shall be allocated based upon a formula to be determined by the Interstate Commission, which shall promulgate a rule binding upon all member states.

The Interstate Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall the Interstate Commission pledge the credit of any of the member states, except by and with the authority of the member state.

The Interstate Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the Interstate Commission shall be subject to the audit and accounting procedures established under its bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the Interstate Commission shall be audited yearly by a certified or licensed public accountant, and the report of the audit shall be included in and become part of the annual report of the Interstate Commission.

The Interstate Commission may not assess, levy, or collect from Vermont in its annual assessment more than $2,000.00 per year. Other funding sources may be accepted and used to offset expenses related to the State’s participation in the compact.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 43

, § 1; amended

2013, No. 56

, § 20, eff. May 30, 2013.

§ 806n.
Member states, effective date and amendment — Article XV.

Any state is eligible to become a member state.

The compact shall become effective and binding upon legislative enactment of the compact into law by no less than ten (10) of the states. The effective date shall be no earlier than December 1, 2007. Thereafter it shall become effective and binding as to any other member state upon enactment of the compact into law by that state. The governors of non-member states or their designees shall be invited to participate in the activities of the Interstate Commission on a non-voting basis prior to adoption of the compact by all states.

The Interstate Commission may propose amendments to the compact for enactment by the member states. No amendment shall become effective and binding upon the Interstate Commission and the member states unless and until it is enacted into law by unanimous consent of the member states.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 43

, § 1.

§ 806o.
Withdrawal and dissolution — Article XVI.

Withdrawal.

Once effective, the compact shall continue in force and remain binding upon each and every member state; provided that a member state may withdraw immediately from the compact by specifically repealing the statute which enacted the compact into law.

Withdrawal from this compact shall be by the enactment of a statute repealing the same.

The withdrawing state shall immediately notify the chairperson of the Interstate Commission in writing upon the introduction of legislation repealing this compact in the withdrawing state. The Interstate Commission shall notify the other member states of the withdrawing state’s intent to withdraw within sixty (60) days of its receipt thereof.

The withdrawing state is responsible for all assessments, obligations, and liabilities incurred through the effective date of withdrawal, not to exceed $100 per year as provided in Article XIV, Section E, of this compact for each year that the State of Vermont is a member of the compact.

Reinstatement following withdrawal of a member state shall occur upon the withdrawing state reenacting the compact or upon such later date as determined by the Interstate Commission.

Dissolution of Compact.

This compact shall dissolve effective upon the date of the withdrawal or default of the member state which reduces the membership in the compact to one (1) member state.

Upon the dissolution of this compact, the compact becomes null and void and shall be of no further force or effect, and the business and affairs of the Interstate Commission shall be concluded and surplus funds shall be distributed in accordance with the bylaws.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 43

, § 1.

§ 806p.
Severability and construction — Article XVII.

The provisions of this compact shall be severable, and if any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision is deemed unenforceable, the remaining provisions of the compact shall be enforceable.

The provisions of this compact shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

Nothing in this compact shall be construed to prohibit the applicability of other interstate compacts to which the states are members.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 43

, § 1.

§ 806q.
Binding effect of compact and other laws — Article XVIII.

Other Laws. Nothing herein prevents the enforcement of any other law of a member state.

Binding Effect of the Compact.

All lawful actions of the Interstate Commission, including all rules and bylaws promulgated by the Interstate Commission, are binding upon the member states.

All agreements between the Interstate Commission and the member states are binding in accordance with their terms.

In the event any provision of this compact exceeds the constitutional limits imposed on the legislature of any member state, such provision shall be ineffective to the extent of the conflict with the constitutional provision in question in that member state.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 43

, § 1.